California statutes. Education Code
8950.

The Legislature finds and declares that the arts and entertainment industries constitute the third largest business sector in the state, and that it is within the interests of the people of the state to preserve the artistic and economic benefits which are derived from these major industries through the establishment of a multidisciplinary arts training program which will enable artistically gifted and talented students to receive intensive training in the arts. It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State Summer School for the Arts be established to provide a training ground for future artists who may wish to study and practice the arts, or to pursue careers in the major performing arts companies and the commercial and fine arts institutions in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1131, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8951.

As used in this chapter, “arts” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: dance; theatre; music; folk art; creative writing; visual arts, including painting, sculpture, photography, and craft arts; design, including graphic arts, computer graphics, and costume design; film; and video.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 6.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8952.5.

(a) The California State Summer School for the Arts shall be governed by a 15-member board of trustees, to be known as the Trustees of the California State Summer School for the Arts. The membership of the board shall be broadly representative of the cultural, ethnic, and geographic diversity of the state, and shall be composed of artists, arts educators, university professors and administrators, arts administrators, representatives of foundations, corporations, and commercial arts industries, and other distinguished citizens of the state. 

(b) The membership of the board of trustees shall be as follows: 

(1) Four members appointed by the Governor. 

(2) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. 

(3) One member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. 

(4) Two members appointed by the State Board of Education, one of whom shall be a current member of the State Board of Education. 

(5) One member appointed by the California Arts Council, who shall be a current member of the council. 

(6) One member appointed by the Trustees of the California State University. 

(7) One member appointed by the Regents of the University of California. 

(8) Four members appointed by the governing board of the nonprofit foundation established pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 8953.5, who shall be the president of the foundation, another officer of the foundation, a member of the governing body of the foundation, and one other person who is a member of the governing body of the foundation, has a prior relationship with the foundation, or has otherwise exhibited a continuing interest in the foundation or in the California State Summer School for the Arts. 

(c) Each appointment shall be for a term of three years, and each member shall be eligible for reappointment. 

(d) The board of trustees annually shall select a chairperson and vice chairperson, and annually shall hold not less than four meetings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

8953.

The board of trustees shall adopt rules and regulations governing fees, applications, auditions, and admission procedures for the California State Summer School for the Arts, and any other procedure or operation necessary to implement the requirements of this chapter. The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The requirement that pupils admitted to the California State Summer School for the Arts be broadly representative of the socioeconomic and ethnic diversity of the state.

(b) In order to be eligible for admission to the summer school, a pupil shall meet one of the following criteria:

(1) The pupil graduated, or will graduate, from junior high school at the end of the school year immediately preceding the summer school session for which he or she is applying.

(2) The pupil is currently enrolled in any of the grades 9 through 12.

(3) The pupil graduated from high school during the school year immediately preceding the summer school session for which he or she is applying.

(c) A pupil’s participation in the summer school shall not be credited toward the pupil’s completion of the course of study prescribed for graduation from high school, unless the pupil’s regular school of attendance tenders payment, no later than the last day of the summer school session, for all application and other fees and expenses charged to the pupil of a kind that would not be charged to a pupil enrolled in the public school system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1131, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8953.3.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the admission of out-of-state pupils to the California State Summer School for the Arts will enhance the national and international standing of the pupils who attend the summer school, and increase the revenues to the school from both tuition and contributions.

(b) Pursuant to the eligibility criteria set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 8953, pupils who are not California residents, including residents of other countries, may be admitted to the summer school, not to exceed in any year 20 pupils or five percent of the total pupil population of the summer school, whichever is less. No admission under this subdivision shall result in the denial of admission under this chapter to a California resident who is eligible for that admission and satisfies applicable artistic qualifications for admission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 193, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8953.5.

The board of trustees shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide for the operation and governance of the California State Summer School for the Arts.

(b) Appoint a person to fill the full-time, permanent, exempt position of Director of the California State Summer School for the Arts. The director shall employ two assistants, one for program and one for administration, and any other necessary staff.

(c) Develop a statewide application and audition procedure. The procedure shall be implemented with the cooperation of the appropriate state and local agencies, including, but not limited to, school districts, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.

The cost of the application and audition process shall be at least partially offset by charging each applicant a fee not to exceed twenty dollars ($20). Applicants who are unable to pay the fee shall petition the State Department of Education for a waiver, which shall be granted or denied pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 8953.

(d) Maintain an advisory committee or committees to assist the board in administering the summer school.

(e) Develop the curriculum of the summer school.

(f) Establish a nonprofit foundation to develop and receive private support for the summer school.

(g) Establish a permanent endowment fund for the summer school.

(h) Exercise any other powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1131, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

8953.7.

The State Department of Education shall assist the California State Summer School for the Arts by providing the following services:

(a) The development and administration of a process for the waiver of registration or program fees pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The distribution to all school districts in the state of notices and guidelines that describe the application procedure, site of the summer school, cost of participation, criteria for admission, and other pertinent information regarding the summer school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1131, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

8954.

The period of instruction for the California State Summer School for the Arts shall be not less than four weeks and no more than six weeks in length. This section shall not be construed to prohibit holding two sessions per year, provided that the summer school shall commence no earlier than one week following the end of the regular school year, and shall be concluded no later than one week prior to the commencement of the next regular school year. The faculty of the school shall be comprised of both arts educators and professional artists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1131, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8955.

(a) The faculty of the California State Summer School for the Arts shall be annually selected, subject to the final approval of the director of the school, by the board of trustees, upon consultation with a faculty selection panel convened by the board for that purpose. The faculty selection panel shall be composed of professional artists and arts educators, selected to be broadly representative of the schools, institutions, arts organizations, artists, colleges, and universities located throughout the state. Members of the board of trustees may serve on the faculty selection panel, but shall comprise no more than one-third of any faculty selection panel.

(b) The faculty shall be comprised of professional artists and arts educators, and shall not be restricted to members of the current faculty of the host institution. The faculty shall be selected to be broadly representative of the socioeconomic and ethnic diversity of the state. Each faculty member shall be chosen for his or her excellence in artistic production, direction, or teaching ability. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the faculty shall not be subject to credentialing requirements or any other restrictions upon eligibility for employment generally applicable to public school instructors, except for the requirement of obtaining a certificate of clearance from the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to Sections 44332.5, 44339, 44340, and 44341.

(c) The members of the faculty shall be paid on a contractual basis and shall not be considered as state employees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1131, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

8956.

(a) The site for the California State Summer School for the Arts shall be chosen for one year or on a multiyear basis to be determined by the board of trustees by the cost effectiveness of the proposals submitted to the board through a competitive request for proposal procedure. The criteria for selection shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Space requirements of the summer school, including residential space and appropriate facilities for all artistic disciplines offered by the summer school. 

(2) Technical, administrative, and support services available to the summer school, submitted with an appropriate budget designating donated services and the costs to the summer school of having other services provided.

(3) Materials, supplies, and equipment available for the exclusive use of the summer school. Materials or equipment which may be used by the host institution during its regular sessions either shall be purchased by the host institution, which may charge the summer school a rental fee for the use of the materials or equipment, or purchased by the summer school, which shall charge the host institution a rental fee for the use of the materials or equipment during the institution’s regular sessions.

(4) Operating funds and in-kind services.

(b) Private institutions, colleges, and universities, appropriate privately owned and operated facilities, and state facilities, including, but not limited to, facilities of the California State University and the University of California, may be used as the site for the summer school. A regional consortium of campuses and adjacent cultural centers operated by nonprofit organizations may be considered as a single site in the selection process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1515, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8957.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that at least 50 percent, but not more than 75 percent, of the actual costs of the California State Summer School for the Arts (CSSSA) for each fiscal year be financed by state funds. The balance of the operating costs shall be financed with fees and private support.

(b) The board of trustees shall set a tuition fee within a range that corresponds to actual costs to the summer school of services per pupil, up to but not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) per session in 1989. These costs shall be limited to tuition, pupil recruitment expenses, faculty and instructional supplies and related equipment, pupil room and board, and security. The amount of this fee may be increased by the board of trustees up to a 5-percent increase each year thereafter. To the extent that fees are not increased as authorized in any year, the board of trustees may increase fees in any subsequent year up to the maximum amount that would have existed if the fees had been increased 5 percent in each year.

(c) The board of trustees may award full or partial scholarships on the basis of need and ability. Pupils who are unable to pay all or part of the fee may petition the board of trustees for a fee reduction or waiver. The department, in conjunction with the board of trustees, shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding fee reduction and waivers, which shall ensure all of the following:

(1) That, to the degree scholarship funds are available, no talented applicant shall be denied admission solely because of inability to pay all or part of the fee.

(2) That any public announcement regarding the summer school program include notification that full scholarships are available, and information regarding the procedure for applying for a scholarship award.

(3) That, pursuant to Section 8953, pupil participation in the summer school program is broadly representative of the socioeconomic and ethnic diversity of the state.

(4) That the percentage of low income pupils attending the CSSSA is not reduced below the average percentage of low income pupils attending the CSSSA in the prior two years, as a result of any fee increase approved pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Subdivision (b) applies only to pupils who are California residents. For pupils who are not California residents, the board of trustees annually shall set a tuition fee that is not less than the total actual costs to the summer school of services per pupil. The total actual costs of services per pupil shall be computed each year for this purpose by dividing the amount of school expenditures for the prior fiscal year by the total pupil population for the prior year.

(e) The Foundation for the California State Summer School for the Arts, which has been established as a nonprofit foundation to support the CSSSA, may raise funds from the private sector that may be used by the summer school for general program operating costs, scholarships, program augmentation, public relations, recruitment activity, or special projects. Private support may include, but not be limited to, direct grants to the summer school from private corporations or foundations, individual contributions, in-kind contributions, or fundraising benefits conducted by any entity.

(f) The board of trustees shall report annually by October 1, to the Governor, the Legislature, and the Department of Finance, the percentages and numbers of pupils that receive each of the following:

(1) Scholarships.

(2) A waiver of all fees.

(3) A reduction of fees.

(4) Data comparable to that required by paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) for the prior three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Early Primary Programs [8970. - 8974.]

8970.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction convened a Task Force on School Readiness that prepared a report which included the following findings and recommendations:

(1) Preschool and kindergarten programs have become more academically oriented with an emphasis on paper and pencil “seat work” and a decreased emphasis on other essential age-appropriate curricular elements such as language development; familiarity with stories, music, and oral language experiences; artistic exploration; social interaction; and large muscle development.

(2) Assessment tests of questionable validity and reliability are being used to delay children’s entrance to kindergarten or to place them in a two-year kindergarten.

(3) An appropriate, integrated experiential curriculum should be provided for children in preschool, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(4) Programs should meet the special needs of our culturally and linguistically diverse pupils as well as the needs of exceptional children. 

(5) Classroom organization and teaching methods should reflect the heterogeneous skills and abilities of children in early primary programs.

(6) School districts should be encouraged to develop communication about linkages between programs for four-year-olds, early primary programs, and the primary and intermediate grades of elementary schools.

(7) The staff of early primary programs should receive appropriate education, training, and remuneration.

(8) Programs should be offered full-day and also should provide before- and after-school care.

(9) Assessment methods of children in early primary programs should be drastically altered.

(10) Parental involvement should be encouraged. 

(11) A public awareness campaign should be launched describing appropriate learning practices for children in preschool, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction issued a Triennial Report on Publicly Funded Child Development Programs that documents the increasing numbers of low-income families eligible but unserved by limited preschool and child care funds, and that presents policy implications for staffing and funding issues.

(c) National studies show future benefits of early intervention programs to society and immediate advantages to California employers in the form of reduced absenteeism, improved worker morale, and increased productivity.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that activities initiated as a result of this chapter shall continue without regard to fiscal year depending, when necessary, on continued funding.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts that establish an early primary program coordinate that program, whenever possible, with the Demonstration in Restructuring of Public Education program, established pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 58900) of Part 31 and, where applicable, with the county interagency children’s services coordinating council, established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 18986.10) of Chapter 12.8 of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1082, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8971.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Child development program” means a full-day or part-day comprehensive developmental program for children ages 0 to 14 years that is administered by the State Department of Education.

(b) “Early primary program” means an integrated, experiential, and developmentally appropriate educational program for children in preschool, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, that incorporates various instructional strategies and authentic assessment practices, including educationally appropriate curricula, heterogeneous groupings, active learning activities, oral language development, small group
 instruction, peer interaction, use of concrete manipulative materials in the classroom, planned articulation among preschool, kindergarten, and primary grades, and parent involvement and education.

(c) “Integrated, experiential, and developmentally appropriate educational program” means a program that is designed around the abilities and interests of the children in the program and one in which children learn about the various subjects simultaneously, as opposed to segmented courses, and through “hands-on” or “active learning” teaching methods that are more appropriate for young children than the academic “textbook” approach.

(d) “Preschool program” means a comprehensive developmental program for children who are too young to enroll in kindergarten.

(e) “Portfolio material” means a selection of representative samples
 of the child’s performance within the program setting that may include, but not be limited to, teacher observations, work samples, developmental profiles, photographs, and audio or video recordings that present a picture of the child’s progress over time.

(f) “School district” includes county offices of education.

(g) “State preschool program” means a part-day comprehensive developmental program for children three to five years of age from low-income families, administered by the State Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 35.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

8972.

(a) The governing board of any school district may establish an early primary program consisting of same-age pupils or any combination of state preschool or child development program, kindergarten, first, second, or third grade pupils, based on an integrated, experiential, and developmentally appropriate educational program. Parent education and parent involvement shall be an integral part of the program.

(b) Observation of a child over time and the use of portfolio material shall be the primary sources of assessment information for making curricular decisions in early primary programs.

(c) Standardized assessment tests may be used for diagnostic purposes only, provided those tests have been demonstrated to be nonbiased, valid, and reliable. These tests shall not be used to deny admission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1082, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8973.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the kindergarten schoolday in an early primary program conducted pursuant to Section 8972 may exceed four hours, exclusive of recesses, provided that both of the following conditions are met:

(a) The governing board of a school district declares that the extended-day kindergarten program does not exceed the length of the primary schoolday.

(b) The extended-day kindergarten program takes into account ample opportunity for both active and quiet activities within an integrated, experiential, and developmentally appropriate educational program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1082, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8974.

School districts with early primary programs shall provide educational continuity from preschool through kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, by accomplishing the following:

(a) Establish connections with public preschool programs, including state preschool, state child development, and federal Head Start programs, to establish a more effective transition of children from preschool to kindergarten.

(b) Promote connections among early primary programs that provide before- and after-school services.

(c) Promote joint activities for teachers and administrators of public preschool programs, including state preschool, state child development, and federal Head Start, and kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive, in areas such as program planning and staff development training related to developmentally appropriate curriculum and assessment practices for young children.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1082, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. School Nutrition [8990. - 9004.]



  ARTICLE 1. Nutrition Education [8990. - 8997.]

8990.

The Legislature encourages nutritional education instructional activities that comply with all of the following:

(a) They emphasize the appealing aspects of healthy eating.

(b) They are participatory, developmentally appropriate, and enjoyable.

(c) They engage families as partners in their
 children’s education.

(d) They encourage teachers responsible for nutrition education, who have received nutrition instruction during their credentialing program, to be adequately prepared and regularly participate in professional development activities to effectively deliver the nutrition education program as planned. Preparation and professional development activities should provide basic knowledge of nutrition, combined with skill practice in program-specific activities and instructional techniques and strategies designed to promote healthy eating habits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 8997.)
-------------------------------------------

8993.

The Legislature encourages school instructional staff to do the following:

(a) Be informed about the negative consequences of using food as a reward and of withholding food from pupils as punishment.

(b) The need to closely coordinate with the food service program and other components of the school health program in order to integrate nutrition concepts
 into the instruction of other subject areas.

(c) Cooperate with other agencies and community groups to provide opportunities for pupil volunteer work related to nutrition, such as assisting with food recovery efforts and preparing nutritious meals for house-bound people.

(d) Collaborate with agencies and groups conducting nutrition education in the community to send consistent messages to pupils and their families. Guest speakers invited to address pupils shall receive appropriate orientation to the relevant policies of the district.

(e) Disseminate information to parents, guardians, pupils, and staff about community programs that offer nutrition assistance to families.

(f) Model healthy eating behaviors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 8997.)
-------------------------------------------

8995.

The Legislature encourages school administrations to do the following:

(a) Offer wellness programs that include personalized instruction about healthy eating and physical activity.

(b) Ensure that the nutrition services, health services, and social services children need in order to learn are provided at the schoolsite or in cooperation with other
 community agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 8997.)
-------------------------------------------

8996.

As used in this article the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Dietary Guidelines for Americans” means the current set of recommendations of the federal government that are designed to help people choose diets that will meet nutrient requirements, promote health, support active lives, and reduce chronic disease risks.

(b) “Nutrition
 education” means a planned sequential instructional program that provides knowledge and teaches skills to help pupils adopt and maintain lifelong, healthy eating patterns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 8997.)
-------------------------------------------

8997.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 2004) for Chapter 10, commencing with Section 8990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Garden Programs [9000. - 9004.]

9000.

The Legislature intends to expand the number of educational gardens and garden salad bars in California public schools by offering startup or expansion grants, implementing garden-enhanced nutrition education, and training and resources to the grantees. For those purposes, the school gardens program is hereby established.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 8997.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.

The State Department of Education shall establish, develop, and implement the instructional school garden program to make competitive grants available for school districts and county offices of education. Schools may incorporate one of the following into the nutrition education program proposal:

(a) An instructional school garden if a garden does not already exist on the site.

(b) A school garden salad bar with a compost program if an instructional garden already exists onsite.

(c) An instructional school garden if an instructional garden does not already exist on the schoolsite and a school garden salad bar with a compost program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 8997.)
-------------------------------------------

9002.

The State Department of Education shall distribute the grants pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), in consultation with education, nutrition, and agricultural experts, at the applicant’s election, as follows:

(a) A maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) to each school that establishes instructional school gardens and an additional five hundred dollars ($500) as a workshop travel stipend to each school district that
 receives a grant.

(b) A maximum of two thousand dollars ($2,000), available on a competitive basis as determined by the State Department of Education, to each school that has an existing instructional garden onsite, and that would offer a garden salad in the school lunch program with these funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 8997.)
-------------------------------------------

9003.

The State Department of Education shall develop, research, and coordinate the best available practices regarding appropriate curriculum for school garden programs in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in consultation with education, nutrition, and agricultural experts. The department shall make the curriculum available to the schools that receive a grant pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative July 1, 2004, pursuant to Section 8997.)
-------------------------------------------

9004.

The department shall select grant recipients from the northern, southern, and central regions of the state and from urban, rural, and suburban areas, so that the recipients are broadly representative of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 61.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 7. JOINT PROGRAMS, SERVICES, AND POWERS (COUNTIES, SCHOOL DISTRICTS, AND HIGHER EDUCATION) [10000. - 11800.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exchange of Teaching Personnel [10000. - 10020.]



  ARTICLE 1. Schools—California State University [10000. - 10003.]

10000.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Trustees of the California State University and any school district or community college district may enter into an agreement for the exchange of personnel between the state university and the district.

(b) The governing board of any school district, or community college district, a county board of education, or the State Department of Education may execute a contract with any California teacher-training institution whereby certificated personnel of the school district, county, or the State Department of Education may be assigned to the teacher-training institution for full-time or part-time duty for a period not to exceed one year.

(c) Any teacher-training institution in California may execute a contract with the governing board of any school district, or community college district, a county board of education, or the State Board of Education whereby certificated personnel of the institution may be assigned to school districts, community college districts, county boards of education, or the State Department of Education for full-time or part-time duty for a period not to exceed one year.

(d) Any such contract shall provide for the payment, by the entity to which a person is assigned to the employer, of a sum equivalent to the salary and other employment costs of the employee. In place of that payment, the contract may provide for the exchange of certificated personnel between the district, county, or State Department of Education and the teacher-training institution. Any such employee shall retain his or her status as an employee of the school district, community college district, county, State Department of Education, or teacher-training institution from which he or she is assigned in all respects during the period of the assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

An agreement authorized by Section 10000 shall provide that an employee of the California State University engaged in teacher training may assume the duties of one of the certificated employees of the district engaged in classroom teaching, and that the certificated employee of the district may assume the duties of the state university employee engaged in teacher training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

During such time as an employee has assumed duties in another entity, pursuant to this chapter, he or she shall continue to be an employee of the California State University, the school district, or the community college district, as the case may be, for all purposes, including, but not limited to, salary, membership in a retirement system, tenure rights, and all other incidents of employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Teacher Aides [10020. - 10020.]

10020.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as preventing school districts from hiring, employing, or otherwise using teacher aides, instructional aides, or teacher-assistants under the terms of existing law and financial support formulas. The commission may study the various roles of such paraprofessionals.

Public and private colleges, universities, and community colleges may develop cooperative programs with school districts or school governing boards to place undergraduate and graduate students in public and private classrooms as teacher aides or assistants. Such assignment may be, at the discretion of the institution, the basis for securing college credit.

A certificate to serve as a temporary teacher-assistant shall be issued, by the county superintendent of schools of the county in which service is to be rendered, to the holder of a recommendation from an accredited college, university, or community college. The certificate shall authorize the holder to serve as a teacher-assistant. No such certificate shall be granted for a period exceeding two years.

The teacher-assistant certificate shall not be used in lieu of a teaching credential. The holder of such a certificate shall work under the immediate supervision of a credentialed classroom teacher to whom the teacher-assistant is assigned, who shall be present in the classroom while the teacher-assistant is performing his or her classroom duties or who shall be available at all times to provide guidance and direction to the teacher-assistant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. CalWORKs Recipients: Instructional and Job Training Plan [10200. - 10200.]

10200.

(a) As used in this chapter, “CalWORKs recipient” means a parent or caretaker relative receiving aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any successor program.

(b) The county superintendent of schools, the local community college districts, the local school districts that provide adult education, and the directors of other job training programs in the county shall develop a plan by March 31, 1998, that provides for instructional and job training services to CalWORKs recipients within that county. The plan shall be approved by the county welfare director. The plan shall include all of the following:

(1) An estimate of the number of CalWORKs recipients in that county that are expected to require education and job training services and a description of the types of services necessary to meet their needs, pursuant to the county plan required by Section 10530 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) An estimate of the number of spaces available in short-term classes that are offered as part of the regular course schedule at educational institutions that may be used by CalWORKs recipients in that county.

(3) An estimate of the number of full-time equivalent students and average daily attendance rates that will be generated by CalWORKs recipients at each institution in excess of the number of recipients attending these institutions in the 1996–97 fiscal year.

(4) Proposals for expansion of services and course offerings that are particularly suited for the needs of CalWORKs recipients.

(5) An analysis of job demand and employment opportunities within that county using currently available, up-to-date information, and an analysis of how the courses and job training programs will assist CalWORKs recipients in securing employment.

(6) A description of outreach efforts that will be undertaken to identify job opportunities for CalWORKs recipients who participate in instruction and job training courses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 15.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Cooperative Improvement Programs [10400. - 10407.]

10400.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to encourage local school districts and community college districts to improve their educational systems and to enrich their educational offerings by utilizing, whenever possible and appropriate, resources which exist in the community. Such resources may include, but not be limited to, business, industry, institutions of higher learning, private consulting firms, other school districts, community college districts, the University of California, or the State of California itself. In the implementation of this chapter, particular emphasis is to be placed upon programs oriented toward agriculture, science, business and commerce, vocational education, teacher training, and, with reference to district administration, development of modern budgetary techniques, such as program planning and budgeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

10401.
